Florida, session 2026, SB1696.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 51 52 Section 1.âSection 403.541, Florida Statutes, is created to 53 read: 54 403.541âAdvanced nuclear reactors.â 55 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 56 (a)ââAdvanced nuclear reactorâ means a nuclear fusion 57 reactor, or a nuclear fission reactor that uses new or 58 significantly improved designs compared to commercial nuclear 59 reactors in operation as of January 1, 2021, including 60 improvements such as: 61 1.âInherent or passive safety features; 62 2.âLower waste yields; 63 3.âImproved fuel performance or efficiency; 64 4.âSignificantly improved designs, materials, fuels, or 65 cooling systems; 66 5.âReduced consumption of cooling water and other 67 environmental impacts; or 68 6.âFlexibility in operational output or ability to 69 integrate into electric or nonelectric applications. 70 (b)ââCommissionâ means the Florida Public Service 71 Commission. 72 (c)ââElectrical power plantâ has the same meaning as 73 provided in s. 403.503. 74 (d)ââNuclear materialâ means byproduct material, source 75 material, and special nuclear material as those terms are 76 defined in s. 404.031. 77 (2)(a)âThe authority to regulate advanced nuclear reactors 78 in this state is granted solely to the commission. At a minimum, 79 the commission shall do all of the following: 80 1.âEvaluate and approve designs for advanced nuclear 81 reactors. 82 2.âIssue permits for the possession, transportation, 83 transfer, and use of nuclear materials in sufficient quantities 84 to facilitate advanced nuclear reactor research, design, 85 testing, construction, and operation. 86 3.âPrescribe safety and construction standards for the use 87 of nuclear materials in the development and operation of 88 advanced nuclear reactors. 89 (b)âThe Department of Health may exercise its powers and 90 duties granted under chapter 404 for the regulation of advanced 91 nuclear reactors under this section. The Department of Health 92 shall develop appropriate guidelines for nuclear facilities and 93 advanced nuclear reactors to mitigate harm to human health 94 resulting from radiological exposure. 95 (c)âThe Department of Environmental Protection may exercise 96 its powers and duties granted under this chapter for the 97 regulation of advanced nuclear reactors under this section. The 98 Department of Environmental Protection shall develop appropriate 99 guidelines for nuclear facilities and advanced nuclear reactors 100 to mitigate environmental harm and promote the efficient and 101 sustainable use of water and other natural resources. 102 (d)âThe commission, the Department of Health, and the 103 Department of Environmental Protection shall jointly establish 104 criteria for the certification of laboratories that perform 105 analysis on nuclear materials for the purpose of researching, 106 designing, testing, or otherwise developing technology for 107 nuclear power plants under this section. 108 (3)âA person, a corporation, or an entity may possess 109 nuclear materials for, and in quantities sufficient to 110 facilitate, the research, design, testing, construction, and 111 operation of advanced nuclear reactors. However, except for 112 active military personnel or contractors acting pursuant to a 113 lawful military order, a person, a corporation, or an entity may 114 not possess nuclear materials in quantities that pose a danger 115 to national defense and security or public health and safety. 116 (4)(a)âThe operator of a facility conducting research and 117 testing of advanced nuclear reactors must obtain a permit from 118 the commission for the use and storage of nuclear materials to 119 facilitate such research and testing. 120 (b)âA person, a corporation, or an entity must obtain a 121 permit from the commission for the transfer, receipt, 122 possession, use, or disposal of nuclear materials relating to 123 the operation of advanced nuclear reactors. 124 (c)âBefore issuing a permit under this subsection, the 125 commission shall determine whether the facility or reactor is 126 equipped with radiation control devices that will abate or 127 prevent radiological contamination in compliance with the 128 standards and rules established under this section. 129 (5)(a)âThe construction or significant design modification 130 of an advanced nuclear reactor must be certified by the 131 commission before such construction or modification may begin. 132 (b)âBefore issuing a certification under this subsection, 133 the commission must, at a minimum, consider all of the 134 following: 135 1.âThe extent to which the design will effectively mitigate 136 and prevent danger to the public health and safety. 137 2.âThe compliance of the design with the safety standards 138 prescribed by the commission. 139 3.âThe ability of the design to address known or reasonably 140 foreseeable risks, including system failures, accidents, natural 141 disasters, and extreme weather events. 142 4.âThe completeness and accuracy of engineering 143 calculations and testing data for the design. 144 5.âThe ability of the design to promote the efficient and 145 sustainable use of water and other natural resources. 146 (c)âThe construction or significant design modification of 147 an advanced nuclear reactor must include radiation control 148 devices that will abate or prevent radiological contamination in 149 compliance with the standards and rules established under this 150 section. 151 (6)âIf an applicant has been issued a permit or 152 certification from another state or a federal agency for the 153 activities under this section, the commission may issue a 154 reciprocal permit or certification if the safety standards of 155 the other state or federal agency are no less stringent than the 156 standards and rules established under this section. 157 (7)âA person, a corporation, or an entity that violates 158 this section or any rule adopted hereunder is subject to a civil 159 penalty not to exceed $100,000 for each violation for each day 160 the violation persists, except that the maximum civil penalty 161 may not exceed $1 million for any related series of violations. 162 (8)âThe commission, after consultation with the Department 163 of Health and the Department of Environmental Protection, shall 164 adopt rules to implement this section. In developing such rules, 165 the commission shall refer to part II of this chapter and the 166 rules and regulations established thereunder. 167 Section 2.âPresent paragraph (j) of subsection (2) of 168 section 186.801, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 169 (l), and a new paragraph (j) and paragraph (k) are added to that 170 section, to read: 171 186.801âTen-year site plans.â 172 (2)âWithin 9 months after the receipt of the proposed plan, 173 the commission shall make a preliminary study of such plan and 174 classify it as âsuitableâ or âunsuitable.â The commission may 175 suggest alternatives to the plan. All findings of the commission 176 shall be made available to the Department of Environmental 177 Protection for its consideration at any subsequent electrical 178 power plant site certification proceedings. It is recognized 179 that 10-year site plans submitted by an electric utility are 180 tentative information for planning purposes only and may be 181 amended at any time at the discretion of the utility upon 182 written notification to the commission. A complete application 183 for certification of an electrical power plant site under 184 chapter 403, when such site is not designated in the current 10 185 year site plan of the applicant, shall constitute an amendment 186 to the 10-year site plan. In its preliminary study of each 10 187 year site plan, the commission shall consider such plan as a 188 planning document and shall review: 189 (j)âThe amount of nuclear energy resources the utility 190 produces or purchases. 191 (k)âThe amount of nuclear energy resources the utility 192 plans to produce or purchase over the 10-year planning horizon 193 and the means by which the production or purchases will be 194 achieved. 195 Section 3.âSubsection (8) of section 366.02, Florida 196 Statutes, is amended to read: 197 366.02âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 198 (8)ââPublic utilityâ means every person, corporation, 199 partnership, association, or other legal entity and their 200 lessees, trustees, or receivers supplying electricity or gas 201 (natural, manufactured, or similar gaseous substance) to or for 202 the public within this state; but the term âpublic utilityâ does 203 not include either a cooperative now or hereafter organized and 204 existing under the Rural Electric Cooperative Law of the state; 205 a municipality or any agency thereof; any entity other than an 206 electric utility that produces electricity from an advanced 207 nuclear reactor that is not interconnected to this stateâs 208 electrical power grid for its own consumption or supplies such 209 electricity for consumption by a single consumer; any dependent 210 or independent special natural gas district; any natural gas 211 transmission pipeline company making only sales or 212 transportation delivery of natural gas at wholesale and to 213 direct industrial consumers; any entity selling or arranging for 214 sales of natural gas which neither owns nor operates natural gas 215 transmission or distribution facilities within the state; or a 216 person supplying liquefied petroleum gas, in either liquid or 217 gaseous form, irrespective of the method of distribution or 218 delivery, or owning or operating facilities beyond the outlet of 219 a meter through which natural gas is supplied for compression 220 and delivery into motor vehicle fuel tanks or other 221 transportation containers, unless such person also supplies 222 electricity or manufactured or natural gas. 223 Section 4.âSubsections (1), (2), and (3) of section 366.92, 224 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 225 366.92âFlorida renewable energy policy.â 226 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to promote the 227 development of clean renewable energy; protect the economic 228 viability of Floridaâs existing clean renewable energy 229 facilities; diversify the types of fuel used to generate 230 electricity in Florida; lessen Floridaâs dependence on natural 231 gas and fuel oil for the production of electricity; minimize the 232 volatility of fuel costs; encourage investment within the state; 233 improve environmental conditions; and, at the same time, 234 minimize the costs of power supply to electric utilities and 235 their customers. 236 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 237 (a)ââClean energyâ includes energy produced by advanced 238 nuclear reactors as that term is defined in s. 403.541, and 239 renewable energy and renewable natural gas as those terms are 240 defined in s. 366.91. 241 (b)(a) âProviderâ means a âutilityâ as defined in s. 242 366.8255(1)(a). 243 (b)ââRenewable energyâ includes renewable energy and 244 renewable natural gas as those terms are defined in s. 245 366.91(2). 246 (3)âEach municipal electric utility and rural electric 247 cooperative shall develop standards for the promotion, 248 encouragement, and expansion of the use of clean renewable 249 energy resources and energy conservation and efficiency 250 measures. On or before April 1, annually, each municipal 251 electric utility and electric cooperative shall submit to the 252 commission a report that identifies such standards. 253 Section 5.âParagraph (m) is added to subsection (3) of 254 section 377.601, Florida Statutes, to read: 255 377.601âLegislative intent.â 256 (3)âIn furtherance of the goals in subsection (2), it is 257 the policy of the state to: 258 (m)âEncourage the research, development, demonstration, and 259 application of domestic advanced nuclear energy resources. 260 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 403.506, Florida 261 Statutes, is amended to read: 262 403.506âApplicability, thresholds, and certification.â 263 (1)(a)âThe provisions of This act applies shall apply to 264 any electrical power plant as defined herein, except that the 265 provisions of this act does shall not apply to the following, 266 unless the applicant has elected to apply for certification 267 under this act: 268 1.âAny electrical power plant of less than 75 megawatts in 269 gross capacity, including its associated facilities, unless the 270 applicant has elected to apply for certification of such 271 electrical power plant under this act. 272 2.âThe provisions of this act shall not apply to Capacity 273 expansions of 75 megawatts or less, in the aggregate, of an 274 existing exothermic reaction cogeneration electrical generating 275 facility that was exempt from this act when it was originally 276 built; however, this exemption shall not apply if the unit uses 277 oil or natural gas for purposes other than unit startup. 278 3.âCapacity expansions of 75 megawatts or less, in the 279 aggregate, of one or more advanced nuclear reactors as defined 280 in s. 403.541 installed within the boundaries of an electrical 281 power plant site previously certified under this act. 282 4.âOne or more advanced nuclear reactors as defined in s. 283 403.541 to be located within the boundaries of an electrical 284 power plant site previously certified under this act, provided 285 that: 286 a.âThe advanced nuclear reactor or reactors are intended to 287 replace an existing electrical power plant located on the site. 288 b.âThe certificate holder intends to retire the existing 289 electrical power plant from service. 290 c.âThe gross capacity of the advanced nuclear reactor or 291 reactors, in the aggregate, does not exceed the gross capacity 292 of the electrical power plant to be retired. 293 5.âOne or more advanced nuclear reactors as defined in s. 294 403.541 that are not interconnected to this stateâs electrical 295 power grid and that are owned and operated by an entity other 296 than an electric utility for purposes of producing power for its 297 own consumption or for use by a single consumer of electrical 298 power. 299 (b)âThe No construction of any new electrical power plant 300 or expansion in steam generating capacity as measured by an 301 increase in the maximum electrical generator rating of any 302 existing electrical power plant may not be undertaken after 303 October 1, 1973, without first obtaining certification in the 304 manner as herein provided, except that this act shall not apply 305 to any such electrical power plant which is presently operating 306 or under construction or which has, upon the effective date of 307 chapter 73-33, Laws of Florida, applied for a permit or 308 certification under requirements in force prior to the effective 309 date of such act. 310 Section 7.âSubsection (3) of section 403.519, Florida 311 Statutes, is amended to read: 312 403.519âExclusive forum for determination of need.â 313 (3)âThe commission shall be the sole forum for the 314 determination of this matter, which accordingly may shall not be 315 raised in any other forum or in the review of proceedings in 316 such other forum. In making its determination, the commission 317 shall take into account the need for electric system reliability 318 and integrity, the need for adequate electricity at a reasonable 319 cost, the need for fuel diversity and supply reliability, 320 whether the proposed plant is the most cost-effective 321 alternative available, and whether nuclear renewable energy 322 resources sources and technologies, as well as conservation 323 measures, are used utilized to the extent reasonably available. 324 The commission shall also expressly consider the conservation 325 measures taken by or reasonably available to the applicant or 326 its members which might mitigate the need for the proposed plant 327 and other matters within its jurisdiction which it deems 328 relevant. The commissionâs determination of need for an 329 electrical power plant shall create a presumption of public need 330 and necessity and shall serve as the commissionâs report 331 required by s. 403.507(4). An order entered pursuant to this 332 section constitutes final agency action. 333 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.